Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.450

Violation of RCW 19.16.250 or 19.16.260—Additional penalty.

If an act or practice in violation of RCW 19.16.250 or 19.16.260 is committed by a licensee or an employee of a licensee in the collection of a claim, neither the licensee, the customer of the licensee, nor any other person who may thereafter legally seek to collect on such claim shall ever be allowed to recover any interest, service charge, attorneys' fees, collection costs, delinquency charge, or any other fees or charges otherwise legally chargeable to the debtor on such claim: PROVIDED, That any person asserting the claim may nevertheless recover from the debtor the amount of the original claim or obligation.

[ 2020 c 30 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 36.]

NOTES:

Application—2020 c 30: See note following RCW 19.16.100.